Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 4. Military Assistance Trust Fund

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 97, § 2, appropriates $5,000,000 from the budget reserve account to the military assistance trust fund created by the act effective July 1, 2004. These funds are to be deposited into a separate account within the trust and agency fund and may be distributed in accordance with W.S.

19-7-401

. Section 2 additionally appropriates $600,000 from the general fund to the military department for the purposes of the act.

§ 19-7-401.
Wyoming military assistance trust fund; establishment of trust fund; corpus inviolate; investment by state treasurer.

A fund is established which shall be referred to as the Wyoming military assistance trust fund. The trust fund shall consist of those funds designated to the fund by law.

The monies deposited into the trust fund established pursuant to this section are inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust fund. The monies shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the trust fund and shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with the preservation of the corpus. The earnings from investment of the corpus of the trust fund shall be credited by the state treasurer in accordance with W.S.

9-4-108

into a separate account and distributed in accordance with W.S.

19-7-402

.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 97, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “An account within the trust and agency” from the beginning and substituted “fund” for “account” at the end; and in (b), deleted “within the trust and agency fund” following “a separate account” in the final sentence.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)” for “W.S.

9-4-711

” in (b).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the third sentence of (b), added "and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with the preservation of the corpus."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in the last sentence of (b), substituted "earnings" for "interest earned," deleted "annually" following "fund shall be" and substituted "in accordance with W.S.

9-4-108

" for "not later than June 30 of each year."

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 19-7-402.
Wyoming military assistance trust fund; uses of trust fund; administration; rulemaking.

The investment income from the military assistance trust fund created by W.S.

19-7-401

shall be administered by the adjutant general only to alleviate financial hardships faced by any of the following:

Any member of the Wyoming national guard or a military reserve unit that is based in Wyoming who has been called to active duty or active state service;

Any Wyoming resident who is a member of a military reserve unit that is not based in Wyoming, if the member is called to active duty;

Any other Wyoming resident performing service in the uniformed services as defined in W.S. 19-11-103(a)(ix) for any branch of the military of the United States;

Members of the immediate family of those personnel identified in paragraphs (i) through (iii) of this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, “immediate family” means spouse and each child as defined by W.S. 2-1-301(a)(v) and, if they are dependents of the member of the military, the parents, grandparents, siblings, stepchildren and adult children of the member of the military;

Any member of the Wyoming national guard who requires assistance in meeting dependent care responsibilities directly related to their service in the Wyoming National Guard to enable participation without financial hardship to the member or member’s immediate family.

The earnings from the military assistance trust fund shall only be used as a last resort to assist eligible military personnel and families deal with financial hardship resulting from the military member’s active duty status or other required military duty and shall not be used to supplant any other private or public funds to the extent such funds are available.

The adjutant general shall promulgate rules and regulations to establish eligibility requirements for assistance under this section. In developing rules and regulations, the adjutant general shall consult with military support groups, including but not limited to the family assistance fund and family assistance centers.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 97, § 1; 2022 ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “any of the following” in the introductory language of (a); added “military” in (a)(i); deleted “and” at the end of (a)(iii); substituted “subsection” for “paragraph” in the second sentence of (a)(iv); added (a)(v); in (b), substituted “earnings” for “interest income earned” and added “or other required military duty.”

§ 19-7-403.
Wyoming military assistance trust fund; annual report; confidentiality; assistance from the state treasurer.

The adjutant general shall include within the department’s biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

a report specifying:

The total amount of interest income earned from the military assistance trust fund during the immediately preceding two (2) state fiscal years;

The total amount of assistance provided from the interest income earned from the military assistance trust fund;

The amount of assistance provided from the interest income earned from the military assistance trust fund by branch of service, regular or reserve duty classification, amounts of individual assistance provided, the reasons that qualified a member of the military or his family for assistance and the balance remaining within the interest income account for future disbursements; and

The name, address, rank and rating, branch of service, deployment location and amounts of financial assistance provided to each eligible military member and to his family.

The information provided pursuant to paragraphs (a)(i) through (iii) of this section shall be public records and available for inspection as provided by W.S.

16-4-201

et seq. The information provided pursuant to paragraph (a)(iv) of this section shall be confidential and shall be available for inspection only by the governor and the legislature. Names, addresses and deployment locations shall not be in any report available for public access. The governor and legislators with legal access to the report shall be required to hold names, addresses and deployment locations confidential.

The adjutant general may request assistance from the state treasurer to prepare the annual report required by this section.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 97, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

rewrote (a)(intro) and in (a)(i), substituted “the immediately preceding two (2) state fiscal years” for “the preceding state fiscal year.”